Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-102
Antelope.

The county of Antelope is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township twenty-three, north, of range eight, west; thence east to the southeast corner of township twenty-three, north, of range five, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range five, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-eight, north, of range eight, west; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 3, p. 212;

R.S.1913, § 814;

C.S.1922, § 716;

C.S.1929, § 25-103;

R.S.1943, § 22-102.